Utah statutes.
72-10-301.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Airport" means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for use for the landing and taking-off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for aircraft buildings or other airport facilities or rights of way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located on them.

(2)  "Air navigation facility" means any facility -- other than one owned and operated by the United States -- used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking-off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of the facilities.

(3)  "Airport hazard" means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land which obstructs the air space required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking-off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to the landing or taking-off of aircraft.

(4)  "Municipality" means any county, city, town, or political subdivision of this state.

(5)  "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representation thereof.

(6)  "Public agency" means the United States government or any of its agencies, a state or its agencies, a municipality or other political subdivision, or a tax-supported organization.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

